src/closed-smj-lex.txt
!This file contains the following  closed parts of speech

!Pronouns
!Subjunctions
!Conjunctions
!Numerals
!Particles
!Interjections

! Pronouns
! ========


!Pointing to all the pronominal subgrops
LEXICON Pronoun
 Personal ;
 Demonstrative ;
 Reflexive ;
 Reciprocal ;
 Interrogative ;
 Relative ;
 Indefinite ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

LEXICON Personal
mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m persproncasesg ;
mån+Pron+Pers+Du1:m persproncasedu ;
mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m persproncasepl ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2:d persproncasesgII ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Du2:d persproncasedu ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2:d persproncasepl ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3:s persproncasesgII ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Du3:s persproncasedu ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3:s persproncasepl ;

LEXICON persproncasesg
 +Nom:ån K ;
 +Nom:ånnå K ;
 +Gen:uv K ;
 +Gen:uvva K ;
 +Acc:uv K ;
 +Acc:uvva K ;
 +Ill:unji K ;
 +Ine:ujna K ;
 +Ela:ujsta K ;
 +Com:ujna K ;
 
LEXICON persproncasesgII
 +Nom:ån K ;
 +Nom:ådnå K ;
 +Gen:uv K ;
 +Gen:uvva K ;
 +Acc:uv K ;
 +Acc:uvva K ;
 +Ill:unji K ;
 +Ine:ujna K ;
 +Ela:ujsta K ;
 +Com:ujna K ;

LEXICON persproncasedu
 +Nom:åj K ;
 +Nom:ådja K ;
 +Gen:unnu K ;
 +Acc:unnuv K ;
 +Ill:unnuj K ;
 +Ine:unnun K ;
 +Ela:unnus K ;
 +Com:unnujn K ;

LEXICON persproncasepl
! The second entry of each oblique case is a less common form
 +Nom:ij K ;
 +Nom:idja K ;
 +Gen:ijá K ;
 +Gen:ijáj K ;
 +Acc:ijáv K ;
 +Acc:ijájt K ;
 +Ill:idjij K ;
 +Ill:ijájda K ;
 +Ine:iján K ;
 +Ine:ijájn K ;
 +Ela:ijás K ;
 +Ela:ijájs K ;
 +Com:ijájn K ;
 +Com:ijáj K ;


! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative
dat+Pron+Dem:da demcas ;
dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:datga K ;
dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen:daŋga K ;
dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen:daŋgas K ;
dát+Pron+Dem:dá demcas ;
dát+Pron+Dem+Sg:dá dátcas ;
duot+Pron+Dem:duo demcas ;
dåt+Pron+Dem:då demcas ;
dála+Pron+Dem:dála K ;
duola+Pron+Dem:duola K ;
dåvla+Pron+Dem:dåvla K ;
dakkár+Pron+Dem:dakkár dakkárcase ;
dakkir+Pron+Dem:dakkir dakkárcase ;
dákkár+Pron+Dem:dákkár dakkárcase ;
dákkir+Pron+Dem:dákkir dakkárcase ;
duokkár+Pron+Dem:duokkár dakkárcase ;
duokkir+Pron+Dem:duokkir dakkárcase ;
diekkár+Pron+Dem:diekkár dakkárcase ;
diekkir+Pron+Dem:diekkir dakkárcase ;
dåkkár+Pron+Dem:dåkkár dakkárcase ;
dåkkir+Pron+Dem:dåkkir dakkárcase ;
dakkárasj+Pron+Dem:dakkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dakkirasj+Pron+Dem:dakkira juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkárasj+Pron+Dem:dákkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkirasj+Pron+Dem:dákkira juohkkahasjcase ;


LEXICON demcas
 +Sg:0 demcassg ;
 +Pl:0 demcaspl ;

LEXICON demcassg 
 +Nom:t K ;
 +Gen:n K ;
 +Acc:v K ;
 +Acc:vva K ;
 +Ill:si K ;
 +Ine:n0na K ; ! was: n'n
 +Ela:ssta K ;
 +Com:jna K ;
 +Ess:nen K ;
 +Par:t K ;
 +Abe:bdá K ;

LEXICON demcaspl
 +Nom: K ;
 +Nom:ha K ;
 :j demcasplobl ;

LEXICON demcasplobl
 +Gen: K ;
 +Acc:t K ;
 +Ill:da K ;
 +Ine:n K ;
 +Ela:s K ;
 +Ela:sta K ;
 +Com: K ;

LEXICON dátcas
 +Nom:hta K ;
 +Nom:htak K ;
 +Gen:ŋga K ;
 +Acc:vga K ;
 +Ill:siga K ;
 +Ine:nnága K ;
 +Ela:stága K ;
 +Com:jnak K ;
 
LEXICON dakkárcase
 +Attr: K ;
 +Attr: NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:is K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;




! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Reflexive
!Two nominative reflexives, and pointer to the rest
iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:iesj K ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom:ietja K ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom:ietja K ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg:0 refloblsg ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl:0 refloblpl ;


LEXICON refloblsg
!The V/V2 alternation due to 3rd person vocalism
!Pointing directly to 1st and 3rd person sublexica for AG & Loc.
!Pointing to exceptional Pl sublexicon for AG and Loc.
+Acc:iehtja PxV1 ;
+Gen:iehtja PxV1 ;
+Acc:ietja PxV23 ;
+Gen:ietja PxV23 ;
+Acc+PxSg1:ietjam K ;	 ! Exceptional Sg12
+Gen+PxSg1:ietjam K ;  ! Exceptional Sg12
+Ill:iehtjas PxCi ;
+Ill:allas PxCi ;
+Ine:ietjan PxCi ;
+Ela:ietjast PxCi ;
+Com:ietjajn PxCi ;

LEXICON refloblpl
+Gen:ietjaj PxCiPlstem ;
+Acc:ietjajd PxCPlstem ;
+Ine:ietjajn PxCPlstem ;
+Ela:ietjajst PxCPlstem ;
+Com:ietjajn PxCPlstem ;

LEXICON PxCiPlstem
 +PxDu1:ma K ;
 +PxDu2:da K ;
 +PxDu3:ska K ;
 +PxPl1:ma K ;
 +PxPl2:da K ;
 +PxPl3:sa K ;

LEXICON  PxCPlstem
 +PxDu1:imme K ;
 +PxDu2:ihtte K ;
 +PxDu3:iskká K ;
 +PxPl1:imme K ;
 +PxPl2:ihtte K ;
 +PxPl3:isá K ;
 
! Reciprocal pronouns 
! -------------------

LEXICON Reciprocal 
gaska+Pron+Recipr:gaska PxCiPlstem ;
gaskajt+Pron+Recipr:gaskajd PxCPlstem ;
gaskan+Pron+Recipr:gaskan PxCPlstem ;


! Interrogative and relative pronouns
! -----------------------------------

LEXICON Interrogative
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:mij K ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:midja K ; !Alt. form
mij+Pron+Interr:ma oblintercas ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:mat K ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Pl:m idiosyncmij ;
guhtis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:guhtis K ; !XXX
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:guhti K ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:gudi K ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:gut K ;
guhti+Pron+Interr:ge oblintercas ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:gæssta K-s ; 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:gæn'na K-s ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Interr:guhtimu ienebusjcase ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Attr:guhtimusj K ;
makkár+Pron+Dem:makkár dakkárcase ;
makkir+Pron+Dem:makkir dakkárcase ;
galla+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:galla K ;
galli+Pron+Indef:galli gallicase ;
galla+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:galla K ;
galla+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill:galláj K ;
galla+Pron+Indef:gall nubbecase ;
galles+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:galles K ;
galles+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:gallás oblsoamescase ;


LEXICON Relative
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:mij K ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:midja K ; !Alt. form
mij+Pron+Rel:ma oblintercas ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Par:mat K ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Pl:m idiosyncmij ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Interr:guhtimu ienebusjcase ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Attr:guhtimusj K ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:guhti K ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom:gudi K ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:gut K ;
guhti+Pron+Rel:ge oblintercas ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:gæssta K-s ; 
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:gæn'na K-s ;
makkár+Pron+Dem:makkár dakkárcase ;
makkir+Pron+Dem:makkir dakkárcase ;


LEXICON oblintercas
 +Sg+Gen:n K ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Acc:vva K-s ;
 +Sg+Ill:si K-s ; 
 +Sg+Com:jna K-s ;
 +Sg+Com:jnas K-s ;
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jda K-s ;
 +Pl+Ine:jn K-s ; !N&J
 +Pl+Ine:jna K-s ;!Spiik
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;
 +Pl+Ela:jsta K ; !Spiik
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 +Ess:nen K ;
 +Ess:n'na K-s ;
 +Ess:n'nas K-s ;

LEXICON idiosyncmij
 +Nom:a K-s ;
 +Nom:aha K-s ;
 +Gen:aj  K ; 
 +Acc:ejt K ; 
 +Ill:ejda K-s ;
! +Ine:ajna K-s ;
 +Ine:ajn K ;
 +Ela:ajsta K-s ;
 +Ela:ajs K ;

LEXICON K-s ! Alternative clitic lexicon
 +Clt:s # ;
 # ;


! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------

LEXICON guhtikobl
 +Sg+Gen:ŋga K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ŋge K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ŋga NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Gen:ŋge NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Acc:vga K ;
 +Sg+Ill:sik K ;
 +Sg+Ill:sisik K ;  
 +Sg+Com:jnak K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jga K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jga NAMÁK ;
 +Pl+Acc:jdik K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jdak K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdak K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jnak K ;
 +Pl+Ela:jstak K ;
 +Pl+Com:jga K ;
 
LEXICON migeobl
 +Sg+Gen:ŋga K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ŋge K ; 
 +Sg+Gen:ŋga NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Gen:ŋge NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Acc:vga K ;
 +Sg+Ill:sik K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n'nak K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:sstak K ; 
 +Sg+Com:jnak K ;
 +Ess:nenik K ;
 +Ess:n'nak K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jga K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jga NAMÁK ;
 +Pl+Acc:jdak K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jdik K ;
 +Pl+Ine:jnak K ;
 +Pl+Ela:jstak K ;
 +Pl+Com:jga K ;


LEXICON oblietjácase
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:s K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 
LEXICON plurietjácase
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K-s ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijna K-s ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
LEXICON oblsoamescase
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:is K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij NAMÁK ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
LEXICON aktakoblcase
 +Sg+Gen:k K ;
 +Sg+Gen: NAMÁK ;
 +Sg+Acc:k K ;
 +Sg+Ela:stik K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:nik K ;
 +Sg+Com:jnik K ;
 

LEXICON Indefinite
aktak+Pron+Indef:avta aktakoblcase ;
guhtik+Pron+Indef:ge guhtikobl ;
iesj#guhtik+Pron+Indef:iesjge guhtikobl ;
fært#guhtik+Pron+Indef:færtge guhtikobl ;
ietjá+Pron+Indef:ietjá oblietjácase ;
ietjá+Pron+Indef:iehtjád plurietjácase ;
mige+Pron+Indef:ma migeobl ;
soames+Pron+Indef:soabmás oblsoamescase ;
goabbák+Pron+Indef:goappá aktakoblcase ;
ednak+Pron+Indef:ednag oblsoamescase ;
galles+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:gallás oblsoamescase ;
fera% mij+Pron+Indef:fera% ma oblintercas ;
fera% mij+Pron+Indef+Pl:fera% m idiosyncmij ;
